Alaska statutes. Title 37. Public Finance.
Article 6. Toll Facilities Revenue Bonds.

Sec. 37.15.610.
Bond authorization.

For the purpose of providing part or all of the money to be used, with or without any grants or other money that may become available, the issuance and sale of revenue bonds of the state in the total principal sum of not to exceed $500,000,000 is authorized to acquire, construct, equip, and install the additions, improvements, extensions, and facilities authorized in AS

37.15.720

and

37.15.730

. The principal of and interest on these bonds are paid out of and secured by the gross revenue derived by the state from the ownership, use, and operation of the toll facilities, and out of any other revenue or money that the state legislature may provide exclusive of any state tax or license.
Bonds may not be issued to assist in the acquisition, financing, or operation of projects without prior approval from the legislature.

History.

(§ 1 ch 162 SLA 1984)

Sec. 37.15.620.
Construction fund.

The toll facilities construction fund is established for deposit of proceeds of the sale of the bonds authorized by AS

37.15.610

and any grant or other money that is legally provided for the same purposes for which the bonds are authorized except for any accrued interest paid on the bonds by the purchaser. The money in the construction fund is used to pay the cost of acquiring, constructing, and equipping facilities authorized in AS

37.15.720

and

37.15.730

and costs incidental to those activities, including costs of the authorization, issuance, and sale of the bonds. To the extent allowed in the bond resolution, money in the construction fund may also be used for the payment of interest on the bonds during the time of actual construction, and for any additional time, not exceeding one year after construction is completed. Money in the construction fund may also be transferred to the bond redemption fund, as permitted by the bond resolution, to establish a reserve for the payment of the principal and interest on the bonds.

The bond resolution may provide for the investment of money in the construction fund as the committee determines. The interest earned upon or any profit derived from the sale of the investment is deposited in the construction fund.

History.

(§ 1 ch 162 SLA 1984)

Sec. 37.15.630.
Revenue fund.

The toll facilities revenue fund is established and shall be set apart from all other money of the state. The toll facilities revenue fund is a trust fund for the purposes under AS

37.15.610

—

37.15.760

, where all revenue, fees, tolls, charges, and rentals are deposited that are derived by the state from the ownership, lease, use, and operation of the facilities authorized by AS

37.15.720

and

37.15.730

. The revenue, fees, tolls, charges, and rentals may not include the proceeds of any state tax or license. The money in the revenue fund may only be used to

pay or secure the payment of the principal of and interest on the toll facilities bonds and principal of and interest on any other revenue bonds issued by authorization of the legislature to provide money to acquire, construct, and equip facilities authorized by AS

37.15.720

and

37.15.730

and to be payable out of the revenue fund;

pay the normal and necessary costs of maintaining and operating the facilities acquired, constructed, or equipped under AS

37.15.610

—

37.15.760

;

pay the costs of renewals, replacements, and extraordinary repairs to facilities acquired, constructed, or equipped under AS 37.15.610 — 37.15.760;

redeem before their fixed maturities any and all revenue bonds issued for the purpose of acquiring, constructing, and equipping facilities authorized by AS 37.15.720 and 37.15.730;

provide money to acquire, construct, and equip necessary additions and improvements to facilities authorized by AS 37.15.720 and 37.15.730; and

provide money to pay any and all other costs relating to the ownership, use, and operation of the facilities.

The investment of money in the revenue fund may be made as the committee determines. The interest earned upon or any profits derived from the sale of an investment under this subsection shall be deposited in the revenue fund.

History.

(§ 1 ch 162 SLA 1984)

Sec. 37.15.640.
Bond redemption fund.

The toll facilities revenue bond redemption fund is established for deposit in trust of money for paying and securing the payment of principal of and interest and redemption premium, if any, on bonds and is set apart from all other money of the state.
The committee, on behalf of the state, shall obligate the state to set aside and pay into the bond redemption fund from the revenue fund an amount of money sufficient to pay the principal of and interest and redemption premium, if any, on the bonds as the payments become due and, if the committee considers it necessary, to set aside and maintain a reserve for this purpose.
The bond redemption fund is drawn upon for the purpose of paying the principal of and interest and redemption premium, if any, on the bonds, and the bonds do not constitute a general obligation of the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 162 SLA 1984)

Sec. 37.15.650.
Bond terms.

The toll facilities bonds are sold in the amounts or series and at the time as determined by the committee. Before selling a series of bonds, the committee shall give notice inviting sealed bids. If satisfactory bids are received, the bonds offered for sale are awarded to the highest responsible bidder. If the committee determines that a bid received is not satisfactory as to price or responsibility of the bidder, the committee may reject the bid received. Bonds, or a series of bonds, may not be sold if the effective interest rate over the life of the bonds exceeds 11 percent per year or that rate of interest that is 125 percent of the rate of the Bond Buyer Index of 20 Municipal Bond Average Yields for the week previous to the date of sale of the bonds, whichever is higher. Interest is payable annually or semiannually.

The bonds mature at the time fixed by the committee. The bonds may be subject to redemption before their fixed maturities as determined by the committee and with the premium fixed by the committee, but a bond may not be subject to redemption before its fixed maturity date unless the right to redeem that bond is expressly mentioned on the face of the bond. The bonds

may be in denominations determined by the committee;

may be issued in coupon form or in fully registered form, and may be registrable as to principal or both principal and interest, all under regulations and conditions the committee provides;

are payable as to principal and interest at the place determined by the committee;

shall be signed on behalf of the state by the governor and shall be attested to by the lieutenant governor, both of which signatures may be facsimile signatures, and each of the interest coupons attached to them shall be signed by the facsimile signatures of these officials;

shall have the seal of the state impressed, printed, or lithographed on them; and

shall be issued under and subject to the terms, conditions, and covenants providing for the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds and the other terms, conditions, covenants, and protective features safeguarding this payment and relating to the maintenance, operation, and improvement of the toll facilities as found necessary by the committee, which covenants may include a provision requiring the setting aside and maintenance of certain reserves to secure the payment of the principal and interest.

If found reasonably necessary, the committee may select a trustee or trustees for the holders of the bonds or any series of the bonds, for the safeguarding and disbursement of any of the money in any of the funds created by AS

37.15.620

,

37.15.630

, and

37.15.640

, or for the duties for authentication, delivery, and registration of the bonds as the committee may determine. The committee shall also fix the rights, duties, powers, and obligations of the trustee or trustees.

In the committee’s determination of all of the matters and questions relating to the issuance and sale of the bonds and the fixing of the maturities, terms, conditions, and covenants of the bonds as provided in (a) — (c) of this section, the decisions of the committee shall be those found to be reasonably necessary for the best interests of the state and its inhabitants, and those that will accomplish the most advantageous sale of the bonds, with due regard, however, (1) to necessary or normal costs of maintenance and operation; (2) to renewals and replacements of and repairs to the toll facilities; (3) to all improvements to toll facilities and property of toll facilities owned, used, operated, or leased in connection with toll facilities; and (4) to the future growth and expansion of all of the facilities and the possibility of additional revenue bond financing for toll facilities purposes. A decision of the committee, as expressed in any bond resolution, is final when any bonds have been issued under the bond resolution.

A bond resolution may provide that the bonds issued contain a recital that they are issued under AS

37.15.610

—

37.15.760

, and any bonds containing this recital are conclusively considered to be valid and to have been issued in conformity with AS

37.15.610

—

37.15.760

.

The validity of the authorization and issuance of bonds is not affected by any proceeding for the acquisition or construction of the additions, improvements, or facilities for which the bonds have been issued or by any contract in connection with the acquisition or construction.

History.

(§ 1 ch 162 SLA 1984)

Sec. 37.15.660.
Bond resolution.

The committee is authorized and directed to adopt the bond resolution and prepare all other documents and proceedings necessary for the issuance, sale, and delivery of the bonds or any part or series of them.
The bond resolution shall fix the principal amount, denomination, date, maturities, place or places of payment, rights of redemption, if any, terms, form, conditions, and covenants of the bonds or each series of them.
The committee shall also determine and provide for the date and manner of sale of the bonds, and shall provide whether the notice of sale is to be published elsewhere in addition to the publication required by AS

37.15.650

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 162 SLA 1984)

Sec. 37.15.670.
Enforcement by holder.

The holder of any bonds or the trustee for the holders of the bonds or any series of them, may, by appropriate proceedings in the courts of record of the state, compel the transfer, setting aside, and payment of money and the enforcement of all of the terms, conditions, and covenants as required and provided in AS

37.15.610

—

37.15.760

and in the bond resolution.

History.

(§ 1 ch 162 SLA 1984)

Sec. 37.15.680.
Amounts required for payments.

The committee shall, before December 31 of each year, commencing with the year in which the bonds are issued, certify to the commissioner of revenue and the commissioner of transportation and public facilities the amounts required in the next ensuing calendar year by a bond resolution to be paid out of the revenue fund into the bond redemption fund and to be paid into and maintained in any reserve fund or account or any other fund or account created by a bond resolution.
The committee shall also certify to the commissioners the last date upon which payments may be made.

History.

(§ 1 ch 162 SLA 1984)

Sec. 37.15.690.
Bond negotiability.

The bonds and the coupons attached to them are fully negotiable instruments under the laws of the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 162 SLA 1984)

Sec. 37.15.700.
Refunding.

The bonds or any part of them may be refunded at or before their maturity by the issuance of refunding revenue bonds of the state if in the opinion of the committee refunding is advantageous to and in the best interest of the state and its inhabitants.

The issuance of refunding bonds need not be authorized by an act of the legislature, and the committee shall adopt the resolution and prepare all other documents and proceedings necessary for the issuance, exchange or sale, and delivery of the bonds. All provisions of AS

37.15.610

—

37.15.760

applicable to revenue bonds are applicable to the refunding bonds and to the issuance, sale, or exchange of the bonds, except as otherwise provided in this section.

Refunding bonds may be issued in a principal amount sufficient to provide money for the payment of all bonds to be refunded by them, and, in addition, for the payment of all expenses incident to the calling, retiring, or paying of the outstanding bonds, and the issuance of the refunding bonds. These expenses include the difference in amount between the par value of the refunding bonds and any amount less than par for which the refunding bonds are sold, any amount necessary to be made available for the payment of interest on the refunding bonds from the date of sale of them to the date of payment of the bonds to be refunded or to the date upon which the bonds to be refunded will be paid under the call of the bonds or agreement with the holders of them, and the premium, if any, necessary to be paid in order to call or retire the outstanding bonds and the interest accruing on the outstanding bonds to the date of the call or retirement.

History.

(§ 1 ch 162 SLA 1984)

Sec. 37.15.710.
Bonds as legal investments.

Toll facilities bonds are legal investments for all banks, trust companies, savings banks, savings and loan associations, and other persons carrying on a banking business, all insurance companies and other persons carrying on an insurance business, and all executors, administrators, trustees, and other fiduciaries.
The bonds may be accepted as security for deposits of all money of the state and its political subdivisions.

History.

(§ 1 ch 162 SLA 1984)

Sec. 37.15.720.
State toll facilities.

The state is authorized to acquire, construct, equip, and maintain toll bridges, tunnels, highways, roads, crossings, and causeways found to be necessary by the commissioner of transportation and public facilities.

History.

(§ 1 ch 162 SLA 1984; am § 2 ch 165 SLA 1988)

Sec. 37.15.730.
Review of toll facility projects.

A toll facility may be financed under AS

37.15.610

—

37.15.760

if the following conditions are met for that toll facility:

the department submits to the governor and the legislature a feasibility study that finds that the toll facility is financially feasible and able to produce revenue adequate to repay the bonds with which it is financed;

if financing in addition to revenue bonds is required to finance the toll facility, the department submits to the governor and legislature a finance plan that includes an estimate of the total cost of the toll facility and a description of the sources of money that will be used to finance the total cost of the toll facility; and

the office of management and budget reviews the feasibility study and the finance plan, if required, and reports its findings and recommendations to the governor and legislature not later than 90 days after the study and plan are received by the office.

History.

(§ 1 ch 162 SLA 1984; am § 3 ch 165 SLA 1988)

Sec. 37.15.740.
Toll facility charges.

The commissioner of transportation and public facilities shall fix and collect the fees, charges, tolls, and rentals derived by the state from the ownership, lease, use, and operation of the facilities authorized by AS

37.15.720

and

37.15.730

and improvements of the facilities as will provide revenue sufficient to comply with all of the covenants of the bond resolution.

History.

(§ 1 ch 162 SLA 1984)

Sec. 37.15.750.
Statutory construction.

AS

37.15.610

—

37.15.760

shall be liberally construed in order to carry out the purposes for which the provisions were enacted, and all existing laws in conflict with AS

37.15.610

—

37.15.760

are superseded as necessary to accomplish the purposes of AS 37.15.610
— 37.15.760.

History.

(§ 1 ch 162 SLA 1984)

Sec. 37.15.760.
Definitions.

In AS

37.15.610

—

37.15.760

, unless the context requires otherwise,

“bond redemption fund” means the toll facilities revenue bond redemption fund created by AS

37.15.640

, including any accounts that are created in that fund after October 4, 1984;

“bond resolution” means the resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds, adopted by the committee under AS

37.15.660

;

“bonds” means the toll facilities revenue bonds authorized by AS

37.15.610

—

37.15.760

;

“committee” means the state bond committee created by AS

37.15.110

, or any other committee, body, department, or officer of the state that or who succeeds to the rights, powers, duties, and obligations of the state bond committee by act of the legislature;

“construction fund” means the toll facilities construction fund created by AS

37.15.620

;

“revenue fund” means the toll facilities revenue fund created by AS

37.15.630

;

“toll facilities” means highways, roads, bridges, tunnels, crossings, and causeways upon which tolls, charges, rentals, or other user fees are placed by the commissioner of transportation and public facilities.

History.

(§ 1 ch 162 SLA 1984; am § 4 ch 165 SLA 1988)